apertium-jpn.jpn.twol
Alphabet
ゃ ゅ ょ  っ ー  。「 」、・
あ い う え お か き く け こ が ぎ ぐ げ ご さ し す せ そ ざ じ ず ぜ ぞ た ち つ て と 
だ ぢ づ で ど な に ぬ ね の は ひ ふ へ ほ ば び ぶ べ ぼ ぱ ぴ ぷ ぺ ぽ ま み む め も や ゆ よ ら り る れ ろ わ を ん
ア イ ウ エ オ カ キ ク ケ コ サ シ ス セ ソ ザ ジ ズ ゼ ゾ タ チ ツ テ ト ダ ヂ ヅ デ ド
ナ ニ ヌ ネ ノ ハ ヒ フ ヘ ホ バ ビ ブ ベ ボ パ ピ プ ペ ポ マ ミ ム メ モ ラ リ ル レ ロ
ヤ ユ ヨ ワ ヲ ン ャ ュ ョ ヮ
1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 %0
亜 哀 挨 愛 曖 悪 握 圧 扱 宛 嵐 安 案 暗
以 衣 位 囲 医 依 委 威 為 畏 胃 尉 異 移 萎 偉 椅 彙 意 違 維 慰 遺 緯 域 育 一 壱 逸 茨 芋 引 印 因 咽 姻 員 院 淫 陰 飲 隠 韻
右 宇 羽 雨 唄 鬱 畝 浦 運 雲
永 泳 英 映 栄 営 詠 影 鋭 衛 易 疫 益 液 駅 悦 越 謁 閲 円 延 沿 炎 怨 宴 媛 援 園 煙 猿 遠 鉛 塩 演 縁 艶
汚 王 凹 央 応 往 押 旺 欧 殴 桜 翁 奥 横 岡 屋 億 憶 臆 虞 乙 俺 卸 音 恩 温 穏
下 化 火 加 可 仮 何 花 佳 価 果 河 苛 科 架 夏 家 荷 華 菓 貨 渦 過 嫁 暇 禍 靴 寡 歌 箇 稼 課 蚊 牙 瓦 我 画 芽 賀 雅 餓 介 回 灰 会 快 戒 改 怪 拐 悔 海 界 皆 械 絵 開 階 塊 楷 解 潰 壊 懐 諧 貝 外 劾 害 崖 涯 街 慨 蓋 該 概 骸 垣 柿 各 角 拡 革 格 核 殻 郭 覚 較 隔 閣 確 獲 嚇 穫 学 岳 楽 額 顎 掛 潟 括 活 喝 渇 割 葛 滑 褐 轄 且 株 釜 鎌 刈 干 刊 甘 汗 缶 完 肝 官 冠 巻 看 陥 乾 勘 患 貫 寒 喚 堪 換 敢 棺 款 間 閑 勧 寛 幹 感 漢 慣 管 関 歓 監 緩 憾 還 館 環 簡 観 韓 艦 鑑 丸 含 岸 岩 玩 眼 頑 顔 願
企 伎 危 机 気 岐 希 忌 汽 奇 祈 季 紀 軌 既 記 起 飢 鬼 帰 基 寄 規 亀 喜 幾 揮 期 棋 貴 棄 毀 旗 器 畿 輝 機 騎 技 宜 偽 欺 義 疑 儀 戯 擬 犠 議 菊 吉 喫 詰 却 客 脚 逆 虐 九 久 及 弓 丘 旧 休 吸 朽 臼 求 究 泣 急 級 糾 宮 救 球 給 嗅 窮 牛 去 巨 居 拒 拠 挙 虚 許 距 魚 御 漁 凶 共 叫 狂 京 享 供 協 況 峡 挟 狭 恐 恭 胸 脅 強 教 郷 境 橋 矯 鏡 競 響 驚 仰 暁 業 凝 曲 局 極 玉 巾 斤 均 近 金 菌 勤 琴 筋 僅 禁 緊 錦 謹 襟 吟 銀
区 句 苦 駆 具 惧 愚 空 偶 遇 隅 串 屈 掘 窟 熊 繰 君 訓 勲 薫 軍 郡 群
兄 刑 形 系 径 茎 係 型 契 計 恵 啓 掲 渓 経 蛍 敬 景 軽 傾 携 継 詣 慶 憬 稽 憩 警 鶏 芸 迎 鯨 隙 劇 撃 激 桁 欠 穴 血 決 結 傑 潔 月 犬 件 見 券 肩 建 研 県 倹 兼 剣 拳 軒 健 険 圏 堅 検 嫌 献 絹 遣 権 憲 賢 謙 鍵 繭 顕 験 懸 元 幻 玄 言 弦 限 原 現 舷 減 源 厳
己 戸 古 呼 固 股 虎 孤 弧 故 枯 個 庫 湖 雇 誇 鼓 錮 顧 五 互 午 呉 後 娯 悟 碁 語 誤 護 口 工 公 勾 孔 功 巧 広 甲 交 光 向 后 好 江 考 行 坑 孝 抗 攻 更 効 幸 拘 肯 侯 厚 恒 洪 皇 紅 荒 郊 香 候 校 耕 航 貢 降 高 康 控 梗 黄 喉 慌 港 硬 絞 項 溝 鉱 構 綱 酵 稿 興 衡 鋼 講 購 乞 号 合 拷 剛 傲 豪 克 告 谷 刻 国 黒 穀 酷 獄 骨 駒 込 頃 今 困 昆 恨 根 婚 混 痕 紺 魂 墾 懇
左 佐 沙 査 砂 唆 差 詐 鎖 座 挫 才 再 災 妻 采 砕 宰 栽 彩 採 済 祭 斎 細 菜 最 裁 債 催 塞 歳 載 際 埼 在 材 剤 財 罪 崎 作 削 昨 柵 索 策 酢 搾 錯 咲 冊 札 刷 刹 拶 殺 察 撮 擦 雑 皿 三 山 参 桟 蚕 惨 産 傘 散 算 酸 賛 残 斬 暫
士 子 支 止 氏 仕 史 司 四 市 矢 旨 死 糸 至 伺 志 私 使 刺 始 姉 枝 祉 肢 姿 思 指 施 師 恣 紙 脂 視 紫 詞 歯 嗣 試 詩 資 飼 誌 雌 摯 賜 諮 示 字 寺 次 耳 自 似 児 事 侍 治 持 時 滋 慈 辞 磁 餌 璽 鹿 式 識 軸 七 叱 失 室 疾 執 湿 嫉 漆 質 実 芝 写 社 車 舎 者 射 捨 赦 斜 煮 遮 謝 邪 蛇 尺 借 酌 釈 爵 若 弱 寂 手 主 守 朱 取 狩 首 殊 珠 酒 腫 種 趣 寿 受 呪 授 需 儒 樹 収 囚 州 舟 秀 周 宗 拾 秋 臭 修 袖 終 羞 習 週 就 衆 集 愁 酬 醜 蹴 襲 十 汁 充 住 柔 重 従 渋 銃 獣 縦 叔 祝 宿 淑 粛 縮 塾 熟 出 述 術 俊 春 瞬 旬 巡 盾 准 殉 純 循 順 準 潤 遵 処 初 所 書 庶 暑 署 緒 諸 女 如 助 序 叙 徐 除 小 升 少 召 匠 床 抄 肖 尚 招 承 昇 松 沼 昭 宵 将 消 症 祥 称 笑 唱 商 渉 章 紹 訟 勝 掌 晶 焼 焦 硝 粧 詔 証 象 傷 奨 照 詳 彰 障 憧 衝 賞 償 礁 鐘 上 丈 冗 条 状 乗 城 浄 剰 常 情 場 畳 蒸 縄 壌 嬢 錠 譲 醸 色 拭 食 植 殖 飾 触 嘱 織 職 辱 尻 心 申 伸 臣 芯 身 辛 侵 信 津 神 唇 娠 振 浸 真 針 深 紳 進 森 診 寝 慎 新 審 震 薪 親 人 刃 仁 尽 迅 甚 陣 尋 腎
須 図 水 吹 垂 炊 帥 粋 衰 推 酔 遂 睡 穂 随 髄 枢 崇 数 据 杉 裾 寸
瀬 是 井 世 正 生 成 西 声 制 姓 征 性 青 斉 政 星 牲 省 凄 逝 清 盛 婿 晴 勢 聖 誠 精 製 誓 静 請 整 醒 税 夕 斥 石 赤 昔 析 席 脊 隻 惜 戚 責 跡 積 績 籍 切 折 拙 窃 接 設 雪 摂 節 説 舌 絶 千 川 仙 占 先 宣 専 泉 浅 洗 染 扇 栓 旋 船 戦 煎 羨 腺 詮 践 箋 銭 潜 線 遷 選 薦 繊 鮮 全 前 善 然 禅 漸 膳 繕
狙 阻 祖 租 素 措 粗 組 疎 訴 塑 遡 礎 双 壮 早 争 走 奏 相 荘 草 送 倉 捜 挿 桑 巣 掃 曹 曽 爽 窓 創 喪 痩 葬 装 僧 想 層 総 遭 槽 踪 操 燥 霜 騒 藻 造 像 増 憎 蔵 贈 臓 即 束 足 促 則 息 捉 速 側 測 俗 族 属 賊 続 卒 率 存 村 孫 尊 損 遜
他 多 汰 打 妥 唾 堕 惰 駄 太 対 体 耐 待 怠 胎 退 帯 泰 堆 袋 逮 替 貸 隊 滞 態 戴 大 代 台 第 題 滝 宅 択 沢 卓 拓 託 濯 諾 濁 但 達 脱 奪 棚 誰 丹 旦 担 単 炭 胆 探 淡 短 嘆 端 綻 誕 鍛 団 男 段 断 弾 暖 談 壇
地 池 知 値 恥 致 遅 痴 稚 置 緻 竹 畜 逐 蓄 築 秩 窒 茶 着 嫡 中 仲 虫 沖 宙 忠 抽 注 昼 柱 衷 酎 鋳 駐 著 貯 丁 弔 庁 兆 町 長 挑 帳 張 彫 眺 釣 頂 鳥 朝 貼 超 腸 跳 徴 嘲 潮 澄 調 聴 懲 直 勅 捗 沈 珍 朕 陳 賃 鎮
追 椎 墜 通 痛 塚 漬 坪 爪 鶴
低 呈 廷 弟 定 底 抵 邸 亭 貞 帝 訂 庭 逓 停 偵 堤 提 程 艇 締 諦 泥 的 笛 摘 滴 適 敵 溺 迭 哲 鉄 徹 撤 天 典 店 点 展 添 転 填 田 伝 殿 電
斗 吐 妬 徒 途 都 渡 塗 賭 土 奴 努 度 怒 刀 冬 灯 当 投 豆 東 到 逃 倒 凍 唐 島 桃 討 透 党 悼 盗 陶 塔 搭 棟 湯 痘 登 答 等 筒 統 稲 踏 糖 頭 謄 藤 闘 騰 同 洞 胴 動 堂 童 道 働 銅 導 瞳 峠 匿 特 得 督 徳 篤 毒 独 読 栃 凸 突 届 屯 豚 頓 貪 鈍 曇 丼
那 奈 内 梨 謎 鍋 南 軟 難
二 尼 弐 匂 肉 虹 日 入 乳 尿 任 妊 忍 認
寧 熱 年 念 捻 粘 燃
悩 納 能 脳 農 濃
把 波 派 破 覇 馬 婆 罵 拝 杯 背 肺 俳 配 排 敗 廃 輩 売 倍 梅 培 陪 媒 買 賠 白 伯 拍 泊 迫 剥 舶 博 薄 麦 漠 縛 爆 箱 箸 畑 肌 八 鉢 発 髪 伐 抜 罰 閥 反 半 氾 犯 帆 汎 伴 判 坂 阪 板 版 班 畔 般 販 斑 飯 搬 煩 頒 範 繁 藩 晩 番 蛮 盤
比 皮 妃 否 批 彼 披 肥 非 卑 飛 疲 秘 被 悲 扉 費 碑 罷 避 尾 眉 美 備 微 鼻 膝 肘 匹 必 泌 筆 姫 百 氷 表 俵 票 評 漂 標 苗 秒 病 描 猫 品 浜 貧 賓 頻 敏 瓶
不 夫 父 付 布 扶 府 怖 阜 附 訃 負 赴 浮 婦 符 富 普 腐 敷 膚 賦 譜 侮 武 部 舞 封 風 伏 服 副 幅 復 福 腹 複 覆 払 沸 仏 物 粉 紛 雰 噴 墳 憤 奮 分 文 聞
丙 平 兵 併 並 柄 陛 閉 塀 幣 弊 蔽 餅 米 壁 璧 癖 別 蔑 片 辺 返 変 偏 遍 編 弁 便 勉
歩 保 哺 捕 補 舗 母 募 墓 慕 暮 簿 方 包 芳 邦 奉 宝 抱 放 法 泡 胞 俸 倣 峰 砲 崩 訪 報 蜂 豊 飽 褒 縫 亡 乏 忙 坊 妨 忘 防 房 肪 某 冒 剖 紡 望 傍 帽 棒 貿 貌 暴 膨 謀 頬 北 木 朴 牧 睦 僕 墨 撲 没 勃 堀 本 奔 翻 凡 盆
麻 摩 磨 魔 毎 妹 枚 昧 埋 幕 膜 枕 又 末 抹 万 満 慢 漫
未 味 魅 岬 密 蜜 脈 妙 民 眠
矛 務 無 夢 霧 娘
名 命 明 迷 冥 盟 銘 鳴 滅 免 面 綿 麺
茂 模 毛 妄 盲 耗 猛 網 目 黙 門 紋 問
冶 夜 野 弥 厄 役 約 訳 薬 躍 闇
由 油 喩 愉 諭 輸 癒 唯 友 有 勇 幽 悠 郵 湧 猶 裕 遊 雄 誘 憂 融 優
与 予 余 誉 預 幼 用 羊 妖 洋 要 容 庸 揚 揺 葉 陽 溶 腰 様 瘍 踊 窯 養 擁 謡 曜 抑 沃 浴 欲 翌 翼
拉 裸 羅 来 雷 頼 絡 落 酪 辣 乱 卵 覧 濫 藍 欄
吏 利 里 理 痢 裏 履 璃 離 陸 立 律 慄 略 柳 流 留 竜 粒 隆 硫 侶 旅 虜 慮 了 両 良 料 涼 猟 陵 量 僚 領 寮 療 瞭 糧 力 緑 林 厘 倫 輪 隣 臨
瑠 涙 累 塁 類
令 礼 冷 励 戻 例 鈴 零 霊 隷 齢 麗 暦 歴 列 劣 烈 裂 恋 連 廉 練 錬
呂 炉 賂 路 露 老 労 弄 郎 朗 浪 廊 楼 漏 籠 六 録 麓 論
和 話 賄 脇 惑 枠 湾 腕


%>:0
%{っ%}:0
%{a%}:0
%{た%}:た
%{i%}:0
%{て%}:て
;

Sets

Arow = あ か が さ ざ た だ な は ぱ ば ま ら や わ ゃ ;

Irow = い き ぎ し じ ち ぢ に ひ び ぴ み り ;

Urow = う く ぐ す ず つ づ ぬ ふ ぷ ぶ む る ゅ;

Erow = え け げ せ ぜ て で ね へ ぺ べ め れ ;

Orow = お こ ご そ ぞ と ど の ほ ぼ ぽ も ろ ょ ;

Rules

"{a} changes the end of the verb to Ca"
Cu:Ca <=> _ %>: %{a%}:0 ;
  where Cu in ( う く ぐ す む ぶ る )
        Ca in ( わ か が さ ま ば ら )
  matched ;

"{i} changes the end of the verb to Ci"
Cu:Ci <=> _ %>: %{i%}:0 ;
  where Cu in ( う く ぐ す む ぶ る )
        Ci in ( い き ぎ し み び り )
  matched ;

"{た} goes to だ if needed"
%{た%}:だ <=> x %>: %{っ%}: _ ;
  where x in ( ぐ む ぶ )
  matched ;

"{て} goes to で if needed"
%{て%}:で <=> x %>: %{っ%}: _ ;
  where x in ( ぐ む ぶ )
  matched ;

"end of verb goes to appropriate thing for た and て forms"
x:y <=> _ %>: %{っ%}:0 ;
  where x in ( う く ぐ す む ぶ る )
        y in ( っ い い し ん ん っ )
  matched;


! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
